Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB691.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52CNONNARCOTIC MEDICATIONSUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT PROGRAMSec.52C01. Definitions.52C02. Program established.52C03. Single county authority requirements.52C04. Use of grant funding.12345678910111213141516171819202122 52C05. Powers and duties of department.§ 52C01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Court." A court of common pleas of a judicial district, a problem-solving court or the Philadelphia Municipal Court."Department." The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs of the Commonwealth."Eligible provider." An organization or entity licensed by the Commonwealth capable of:(1) assessing an offender to determine if the offender is a candidate to whom medication that prevents a relapse to drug and alcohol dependence should be administered;(2) providing an individualized treatment plan; and(3) administering a Federal Drug Administration-approved nonnarcotic medication indicated for use in treating a substance use disorder."Nonnarcotic medication-assisted substance use disorder treatment." A substance use disorder treatment that includes the use of a Federal Drug Administration-approved nonnarcotic medication indicated for use in treating a substance use disorder as well as counseling and other substance use disorder treatment measures as deemed clinically appropriate by an eligible provider."Program." The Nonnarcotic Medication Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program established under section 52C02 (relating to program established)."Single county authority." An agency designated by the Department of Health under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.221, 20250SB0691PN0700 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.63), known as the Pennsylvania Drug and Alcohol Abuse Control Act, to plan and coordinate drug and alcohol prevention, intervention and treatment services for a geographic area that may consist of one or more counties.§ 52C02. Program established.The Nonnarcotic Medication Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program is established within the department to increase opportunities for single county authorities to provide comprehensive substance use disorder treatment to offenders as may be clinically appropriate through the awarding of grants. To the extent that grant money is available, a single county authority may contract with an eligible provider to make available nonnarcotic medication-assisted substance use disorder treatment to an offender upon whom a court imposes a sentence of confinement, intermediate punishment, an alternative sentence, probation, Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition or a fine.§ 52C03. Single county authority requirements.In order to be eligible for grant funding under the program, a single county authority shall:(1) Make an application on a form and in a manner determined by the department.(2) Enter into a contract with one or more eligible providers as required under section 52C04 (relating to use of grant funding).(3) Meet any other requirement established by the department.§ 52C04. Use of grant funding.(a) General rule.--Except as provided for in subsection (b), a single county authority awarded a grant under the program shall contract with an eligible provider that shall:20250SB0691PN0700 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Assess each offender to determine if the offender is a candidate to be administered medication that prevents relapse to substance use dependence.(2) Create an individualized program for each offender identified under paragraph (1).(3) Provide access to and administer nonnarcotic medication-assisted substance use disorder treatment when clinically appropriate.(4) If determined to not be a candidate for nonnarcotic medication-assisted substance use disorder treatment, provide recommendations to the single county authority as to what type, if any, of medication assisted treatment may be necessary or helpful to the offender and may make a referral to another medication assisted treatment facility that can provide the appropriate treatment.(5) Provide clinically appropriate inpatient or outpatient services determined necessary to support each individual's treatment plan.(6) Establish a plan and timetable to collect and disseminate the de-identified personal information to the department relating to relapses and overall effectiveness of the program.(b) Exception.--If a single county authority is approved by the department as meeting all of the requirements under subsection (a), the single county authority shall be exempt from the requirement to contract with an eligible provider.§ 52C05. Powers and duties of department.(a) Powers and duties.--The department shall:(1) Develop a form for single county authorities to apply for grant funding under the program.20250SB0691PN0700 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Establish criteria for eligible single county authorities applying for grant funding under the program.(3) Create a form available to eligible providers to be used to confirm that an offender is eligible for and enrolled in the program.(4) Promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement this chapter.(5) Issue a report to the General Assembly relating to relapses and overall effectiveness of the program no later than one year from the effective date of this section and no later than December 15 of each calendar year thereafter.(b) Limits on grant awards.--Grant awards shall be at the discretion of the department and shall be limited to amounts annually appropriated to the department for the program.(c) Statewide substance use disorder treatment assessment coordinator.--To the extent that money is available, the department may appoint a Statewide substance use disorder treatment assessment coordinator. The coordinator may:(1) Encourage and assist in the establishment of substance use disorder treatment assessments in each judicial district.(2) Identify sources of funding for substance use disorder treatment assessments, including the availability of grants.(3) Provide coordination and technical assistance for grant applications.(4) Develop model guidelines for the administration of substance use disorder treatment assessments.(5) Establish procedures for monitoring substance use disorder treatment assessments and for evaluating the 20250SB0691PN0700 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effectiveness of substance use disorder treatment assessments.(d) Advisory committee.--The department may establish, from available money, an interdisciplinary and interbranch advisory committee to advise and assist the Statewide substance use disorder treatment assessment coordinator in monitoring and administrating substance use disorder treatment assessments Statewide.Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 918. Court assessments for substance use disorder treatment.(a) Establishment.--The court of common pleas of a judicial district, a problem-solving court and the Philadelphia Municipal Court may order an offender charged with a drug-related offense upon whom a court imposes a sentence of confinement, intermediate punishment, an alternative sentence, probation, Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition or a fine to be assessed by an eligible provider to determine whether the use of a nonnarcotic medication-assisted substance use disorder treatment program may be clinically appropriate for the offender. The court may adopt local rules for substance use disorder treatment assessments. The local rules may not be inconsistent with this section or any rules established by the General Assembly or the Supreme Court.(b) Failure to participate.--If treatment is determined clinically appropriate by an eligible provider, an offender's failure to participate in a recommended treatment plan as determined by the court-ordered assessment may be considered by the court to be a probation or parole violation under appropriate State or local court rules.(c) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used 20250SB0691PN0700 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Drug-related offense." A criminal offense that a court determines was motivated by the offender's consumption of or addiction to alcohol or a controlled substance, counterfeit, designer drug, drug, immediate precursor or marihuana, as those terms are defined in the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Eligible provider." An organization or entity licensed by the Commonwealth capable of:(1) assessing an offender to determine if the offender is a candidate to whom medication that prevents a relapse to drug and alcohol dependence should be administered;(2) providing an individualized treatment plan; and(3) administering a Federal Drug Administration-approved nonnarcotic medication indicated for use in treating a substance use disorder."Nonnarcotic medication-assisted substance use disorder treatment." A substance use disorder treatment that includes the use of a Federal Drug Administration-approved nonnarcotic medication indicated for use in treating a substance use disorder as well as counseling and other substance use disorder treatment measures as deemed clinically appropriate by an eligible provider.Section 3. Section 9912 of Title 42 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 9912. Supervisory relationship to offenders.* * *(e.2) Recommendation of offenders for nonnarcotic 20250SB0691PN0700 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medication-assisted substance use disorder treatment.--(1) An officer may recommend that an offender under their supervision be assessed by an eligible provider to determine whether the use of the program may be clinically appropriate for the offender as described in section 918 (relating to court assessments for substance use disorder treatment).(2) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph:"Eligible provider." An organization or entity licensed by the Commonwealth capable of:(i) assessing an offender to determine if the offender is a candidate to whom medication that prevents a relapse to drug and alcohol dependence should be administered;(ii) providing an individualized treatment plan; and(iii) administering a Federal Drug Administration-approved nonnarcotic medication indicated for use in treating a substance use disorder."Program." The Nonnarcotic Medication Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program established under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 52C (relating to Nonnarcotic Medication Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program).* * *Section 4. Section 6182 of Title 61 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6182. Supervisory relationship to offenders.* * *(e.1) Recommendation of offenders for nonnarcotic 20250SB0691PN0700 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medication-assisted substance use disorder treatment.--(1) An agent may recommend that an offender under their supervision be assessed by an eligible provider to determine whether the use of the program may be clinically appropriate for the offender as described in 42 Pa.C.S. § 918 (relating to court assessments for substance use disorder treatment).(2) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph:"Eligible provider." An organization or entity licensed by the Commonwealth capable of:(i) assessing an offender to determine if the offender is a candidate to whom medication that prevents a relapse to drug and alcohol dependence should be administered;(ii) providing an individualized treatment plan; and(iii) administering a Federal Drug Administration-approved nonnarcotic medication indicated for use in treating a substance use disorder."Program." The Nonnarcotic Medication Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program established under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 52C (relating to Nonnarcotic Medication Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program).* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0691PN0700 - 9 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425